Washington statutes.
RCW 31.35.010

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds and declares that nondepository agricultural lenders can enhance their access to working capital for the purpose of financing agricultural borrowers by using the United States farmers home administration loan guaranty program. The farmers home administration loan guaranty program provides financing to agricultural borrowers needing working capital and longer term financing for the purchase of real estate, agricultural production expenses, debt refinancing, equipment, and the purchase of other fixed assets. Loans can be made to agricultural borrowers by nondepository lenders and guaranteed by the farmers home administration only if the state provides an ongoing opportunity for examination of such entities to confirm good lending practices and solvency.

It is the intent of the legislature to empower the director of financial institutions to examine nondepository agricultural lenders for the purpose of allowing such lenders to qualify for participation in the farmers home administration loan guaranty program.

[ 1994 c 92 s 251; 1990 c 134 s 1.]